Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 30

Human Trafficking Advisory Council

4-3-3001. Human trafficking advisory council — purpose — meetings.

The Tennessee bureau of investigation shall form a human trafficking advisory council, which shall convene on an as-needed basis to further develop and implement a state plan for the prevention of human trafficking; provided, that the council shall convene at least one (1) meeting each January regarding legislation.

Acts 2015, ch. 510, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2015, ch. 510, § 1 repealed and reenacted this part with one section. By authority of the Code Commission, the section has been codified as two sections, §§ 4-3-3001 and4-3-3002.

Compiler's Notes. Former part, §§4-3-3001 —4-3-3005 (Acts 2013, ch. 464, § 1), concerning the human trafficking task force, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2015, ch. 510, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

For the Preamble to the act concerning the reformation of the entity examining the issue of human trafficking in Tennessee into the Human Trafficking Advisory Council under the direction of the Tennessee Bureau of Investigation, see Acts 2015, ch. 510.

Cross-References. Offense of human trafficking, §39-13-314.

Tennessee Human Trafficking Resource Center Hotline Act, § 39-13-313.

Trafficking in children, title 37, ch. 5, part 4.

Victims of human trafficking, §71-1-135.

4-3-3002. Advisory council.

The Tennessee bureau of investigation shall appoint appropriate persons as leadership of the advisory council. Membership of the advisory council shall consist of:

At least one (1) representative from the Tennessee bureau of investigation serving as leadership for the advisory council;

One (1) representative from each of the following:

Office of the attorney general and reporter;

Department of labor and workforce development;

Tennessee association of chiefs of police;

Tennessee sheriffs' association;

Department of safety;

District attorneys general conference;

District public defenders conference;

Department of health;

Department of children's services;

Department of human services; and

Alcoholic beverage commission;

At least one (1) representative from each of the following entities, associations, or categories:

A nongovernmental organization specializing in human trafficking;

A member of a community or group disproportionately affected by human trafficking;

An agency or group specializing in child services and runaway services;

An academic researcher specializing in human trafficking; and

A victim of human trafficking; and

One (1) member of the house of representatives to be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and one (1) member of the senate to be appointed by the speaker of the senate.

Acts 2015, ch. 510, § 1; 2020, ch. 602, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2015, ch. 510, § 1 repealed and reenacted this part with one section. By authority of the Code Commission, the section has been codified as two sections, §§ 4-3-3001 and4-3-3002.

Compiler's Notes. Former part, §§4-3-3001 —4-3-3005 (Acts 2013, ch. 464, § 1), concerning the human trafficking task force, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2015, ch. 510, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

For the Preamble to the act concerning the reformation of the entity examining the issue of human trafficking in Tennessee into the Human Trafficking Advisory Council under the direction of the Tennessee Bureau of Investigation, see Acts 2015, ch. 510.

Cross-References. Offense of human trafficking, §39-13-314.

Tennessee Human Trafficking Resource Center Hotline Act, § 39-13-313.

Trafficking in children, title 37, ch. 5, part 4.

Victims of human trafficking, §71-1-135.

Parts 31-48

[Reserved]